Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-258
Client; home inspection; limitations.

An agent of the board may make an operation inspection in the home of a client if the inspection is limited to the activities, procedures, and materials of the barber providing the home barber services.

Laws 2020, LB755, § 28.